Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 5. Medicaid Fraud Control Act.

§ 43-13-201.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Medicaid Fraud Control Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-203.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Benefit” means the receipt of money, goods, services or anything of pecuniary value.

“False statement” or “false representation” means a statement or representation knowingly and wilfully made by a person knowing of the falsity of the statement or representation.

“Knowing” and “knowingly” means that a person is aware of the nature of his conduct and that such conduct is substantially certain to cause the intended result.

“Medicaid benefit” means a benefit paid or payable under the Medicaid program established under Section 43-13-101 et seq.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, unincorporated association, partnership or other form of business association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-205.
False representations or statements in application for Medicaid benefits; concealment or nondisclosure of facts.

A person shall not knowingly make or cause to be made a false representation of a material fact in an application for Medicaid benefits.

A person shall not knowingly make or cause to be made a false statement of a material fact for use in determining rights to a Medicaid benefit.

A person, who having knowledge of the occurrence of an event affecting his initial or continued right to receive a Medicaid benefit, shall not conceal or fail to disclose that event with intent to obtain a medicaid benefit to which the person or any other person is not entitled or in an amount greater than that to which the person or any other person is entitled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-207.
Kickbacks and bribes.

A person shall not solicit, offer or receive a kickback or bribe in the furnishing of goods or services for which payment is or may be made in whole or in part pursuant to the Medicaid program, or make or receive any such payment, or receive a rebate of a fee or charge for referring an individual to another person for the furnishing of such goods or services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-209.
False statements or false representations as to conditions or operation of institution or facility.

A person shall not knowingly and wilfully make, induce or seek to induce the making of a false statement or false representation of a material fact with respect to the conditions or operation of an institution or facility in order that the institution or facility may qualify, upon initial certification or upon recertification, to receive Medicaid benefits as a hospital, skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility or home health agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-211.
Conspiracy.

A person shall not enter into an agreement, combination or conspiracy to defraud the state by obtaining or aiding another to obtain the payment or allowance of a false, fictitious or fraudulent claim for Medicaid benefits.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-213.
False or fraudulent claim.

A person shall not make, present or cause to be made or presented a claim for Medicaid benefits, knowing the claim to be false, fictitious or fraudulent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-215.
Penalties.

A person who violates any provision of Sections 43-13-205 through 43-13-213 shall be guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), or both. Sentences imposed for convictions of separate offenses under this article may run consecutively.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-217.
Evidentiary matters concerning false statements or representations.

In any prosecution under this article, it shall not be necessary to show that the person had knowledge of similar acts having been performed in the past on the part of persons acting on his behalf, nor to show that the person had actual notice that the acts by persons acting on his behalf occurred, in order to establish the fact that a false statement or representation was knowingly made.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-219.
Medicaid fraud control unit.

There is hereby created within the office of the attorney general a “Medicaid Fraud Control Unit.” The unit shall consist of a director appointed by the attorney general and such attorneys, auditors, investigator and other such personnel as are necessary to conduct the activities of the unit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-221.
Attorney General; investigation and prosecution; investigator status as law enforcement officer.

The Attorney General, acting through the Director of the Fraud Control Unit, may, in any case involving alleged violations of this article, conduct an investigation or prosecution. In conducting such actions, the Attorney General, acting through the director, shall have all the powers of a district attorney, including the powers to issue or cause to be issued subpoenas or other process.

Persons employed by the Attorney General as investigators in the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit shall serve as law enforcement officers as defined in Section 45-6-3, and they shall be empowered to make arrests and to serve and execute search warrants and other valid legal process anywhere within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 11; Laws, 1998, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 43-13-223.
Jurisdiction; service of process.

An action brought in connection with any matter under this article may be filed in the circuit court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or in the circuit court of the county in which the defendant resides, and may be prosecuted to final judgment in satisfaction there.

Process issued by a court in which an action is filed may be served anywhere in the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-225.
Civil liability and penalty of health care provider.

A health care provider or vendor committing any act or omission in violation of this article shall be directly liable to the state and shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty equal to the full amount received, plus an additional civil penalty equal to triple the full amount received.

A criminal action need not be brought against a person for that person to be civilly liable under this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-227.
Injunction; appointment of receiver for residential health care facility.

As a means of protecting the health, safety and welfare of patients in residential health care facilities, including hospitals and nursing homes, whenever there is probable cause that any acts or omissions in violation of this article have been committed by a person who is in control of assets purchased, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, with funds from the Medicaid program and is likely to convert, destroy or remove those assets, the attorney general, acting through the director of the fraud control unit, shall be authorized to petition the chancery court of the county in which those assets may be found to enjoin the person in control of the assets from converting, destroying or removing those assets, and to appoint a receiver to manage those assets until the investigation and any litigation are completed.

The chancery court shall, immediately upon receipt of the petition of the attorney general, acting through the director of the fraud control unit, enjoin the person in control of the assets from converting, destroying or removing those assets.

The chancery court shall issue an order to show cause why a receiver should not be appointed, returnable within ten (10) days after filing of the petition.

If the chancery court finds that the facts warrant the granting of the petition to appoint a receiver, the court shall appoint a receiver to take charge of the residential health care facility and any other assets involved. The court may determine fair compensation for the receiver.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-229.
Inspection and audit of health care provider records; cessation of reimbursement for failure to disclose.

During any investigation under this article, the attorney general, acting through the director of the fraud control unit, shall have the right to audit and to inspect the records of any health care provider or vendor of Medicaid benefits.

Reimbursement under the Medicaid program shall not be available for services furnished by a provider or vendor who is otherwise eligible for Medicaid benefits during any period when such provider or vendor has refused to provide the attorney general and the director of the fraud control unit such information as the unit may request in order to complete its investigation.

Suspension of Medicaid reimbursement payments shall continue during all periods during which any part of any requested records are not produced, notwithstanding any administrative, legal or other proceedings which may be brought or maintained by such provider or vendor or by any other party to forestall, modify or prevent the request for records.

As used in this section, “requested records” means those records required by the unit for investigative or prosecutorial purposes, and requested by subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, grand jury subpoena, administrative demand, search warrant, or other process, demand or written request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-231.
Power of local authorities.

The powers of the attorney general, acting through the director of the fraud control unit, under this article shall not diminish the powers of local authorities to investigate and/or prosecute criminal conduct within their respective jurisdictions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 43-13-233.
Existing law not affected.

Nothing in this article shall in any way limit any penalties or remedies which may be available under any other statute or law of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 503, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).